Washington statutes.
RCW 17.28.251

Borrowing money or issuing warrants in anticipation of revenue.

A mosquito control district may, prior to the receipt of taxes raised by levy, borrow money or issue warrants of the district in anticipation of revenue, and such warrants shall be redeemed from the first money available from such taxes.

[ 1959 c 64 s 3.]